Maine, session 132, LD1397.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §4004, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Funding community-based organizations that provide family-centered
programs. The department shall provide funding for community-based organizations to
administer family-centered programs that provide positive childhood experiences and lead
to increased social and economic mobility for families. These programs must include, but
are not be limited to:
A. Programs rated as "well-supported," "supported" or "promising" by the Title IV-E
Prevention Services Clearinghouse established by the United States Department of
Health and Human Services, Administration for Children and Families; and
B. Programs that are built on a so-called 2-generation approach or a so-called whole
family approach to child and family well-being.